test/src/gt-desc-yamls/nounDES_gt-desc.ana.yaml
  Noun - artihkal: # GÁMAS
    artihkal+N+Sg+Nom: artihkal
    artihkal+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: artihkkal
    artihkal+N+Sg+Ine: artihkkalin
    artihkal+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: artihkalin
    artihkal+N+Sg+Ill: artihkkalij
    artihkal+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: artihkalij
    artihkal+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: artihkkalasj
    artihkal+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: artihkalasj

  Noun - bena: # BENA
    bena+N+Sg+Nom: bena
    bena+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: bednak
    bena+N+Sg+Ine: bednagin
    bena+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: benagin
    bena+N+Sg+Ill: bednagij
    bena+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: benagij
    bena+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bednagasj
    bena+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: benagasj
    
  Noun - bassemsájger: # SÅHKÅR
    bassemsájger+N+Sg+Nom: bassemsájger
    bassemsájger+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: bassemsájggár
    bassemsájger+N+Sg+Ine: bassemsájggárin
    bassemsájger+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: bassemsájgerin
    bassemsájger+N+Sg+Ill: bassemsájggárij
    bassemsájger+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: bassemsájgerij
    bassemsájger+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bassemsájggárasj
    bassemsájger+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bassemsájgerasj


  Noun - båndor: # SÅHKÅR
    båndor+N+Sg+Nom: båndor
    båndor+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: bånndur
    båndor+N+Sg+Ine: bånndurin
    båndor+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: båndorin
    båndor+N+Sg+Ill: bånndurij
    båndor+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: båndorij
    båndor+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bånndurasj
    båndor+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båndorasj

  Noun - duber: # SÅHKÅR
    duber+N+Sg+Nom: duber
    duber+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: duhpár
    duber+N+Sg+Ine: duhpárin
    duber+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: duberin
    duber+N+Sg+Ill: duhpárij
    duber+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: duberij
    duber+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duhpárasj
    duber+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duberasj

  Noun - judos: # ÅRES
    judos+N+Sg+Nom: judos
    judos+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: juhtus
    judos+N+Sg+Ine: juhtusin
    judos+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: judosin
    judos+N+Sg+Ill: juhtusij
    judos+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: judosij
    judos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhtusasj
    judos+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: judosasj

  Noun - åroj: # ÅRES
    åroj+N+Sg+Nom: åroj
    åroj+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: årruj
    åroj+N+Sg+Ine: årruhin
    åroj+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: årojin
    åroj+N+Sg+Ill: årruhij
    åroj+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: årojij
    åroj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: årruhasj
    åroj+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: årojasj

  Noun - gierkav: # GÁMAS
    gierkav+N+Sg+Nom: gierkav
    gierkav+N+Sg+Nom: gierkam
    gierkav+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: gierkkam
    gierkav+N+Sg+Ine: gierkkamin
    gierkav+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: gierkamij
    gierkav+N+Sg+Ill: gierkkamij
    gierkav+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: gierkamij
    gierkav+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gierkkamasj
    gierkav+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gierkamasj

  Noun - njuovtjav: # GÁMAS
    njuovtjav+N+Sg+Nom: njuovtjav
    njuovtjav+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [njuoktjam, njuovtja]
    njuovtjav+N+Sg+Ine: njuoktjamin
    njuovtjav+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: njuovtjamin
    njuovtjav+N+Sg+Ill: njuoktjamij
    njuovtjav+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: njuovtjamij
    njuovtjav+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: njuoktjamasj
    njuovtjav+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: njuovtjamasj

  Noun - máles: # ÅRES
    máles+N+Sg+Nom: máles
    máles+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: mállás
    máles+N+Sg+Ine: mállásin
    máles+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: málesin
    máles+N+Sg+Ill: mállásij
    máles+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: málesij
    máles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: mállásasj
    máles+N+Err/Orth+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: málesasj
      
  Noun - gieddetjuohppe: # ACTOR, Err/Der
    gieddetjuohppe+N+Sg+Nom: gieddetjuohppe
    gieddetjuohppe+N+Sg+Ine: gieddetjuohppen
    gieddetjuohppe+N+Sg+Ill: gieddetjuohppáj
    
  Noun - nuorttaviesun: # Err/Der
    nuorttaviesun+N+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: nuorttaviesun
    nuorttaviesun+N+Err/Der+Sg+Ine: nuorttaviesunin
    nuorttaviesun+N+Err/Der+Sg+Ill: nuorttaviesunij
    
  Noun - sebrulasj: # BERULASJ, , -dtj- stem sub tagged
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Nom: sebrulasj 
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: sebrulattjam
    sebrulasj+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: sebruladtjam
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Gen: sebrulattja
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: sebrulattjama
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Acc: sebrulattjav
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Ine: sebrulattjan 
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Ill: sebrulattjaj
    sebrulasj+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: sebruladtjaj
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Ela: sebrulattjas
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Com: sebrulattjajn
    sebrulasj+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: sebrulattjajna
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Nom: sebrulattja
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Gen: sebrulattjaj
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Acc: sebrulattjajt
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Ine: sebrulattjajn
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Ill: sebrulattjajda
    sebrulasj+N+Err/Orth+Pl+Ill: [sebrulattjada, sebrulattjajde]
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: sebrulattjajdiseda
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Ela: sebrulattjajs
    sebrulasj+N+Pl+Com: sebrulattjaj
    sebrulasj+N+Ess: sebrulattjan
    sebrulasj+N+Err/Orth+Ess: sebruladtjan
    sebrulasj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sebrulattjasj
    sebrulasj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sebrulattjatjasj
    sebrulasj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sebrulasj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sebrulasj+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sebrulasj+N+Abe: []

  Noun - sjámpoj: # ÅLMÅJ_LOAN
    sjámpoj+N+v1+Sg+Nom: sjámpoj
    sjámpoj+N+v2+Sg+Nom: sjámpoj
    sjámpoj+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [sjámmpoj, sjámmpu, shampo, sjámpo]
    sjámpoj+N+v1+Sg+Ine: sjámmpun
    sjámpoj+N+v2+Sg+Ine: sjámmpuhin
    sjámpoj+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [shampoj, sjámpuj]
    sjámpoj+N+v1+Sg+Ill: sjámmpuj
    sjámpoj+N+v2+Sg+Ill: sjámmpuhij
